transducers/Even/eve.lexd
LEXICON NounBase
<ammu>:ammu
<oron>:oro{n}
<d'u>:d'u
<uruku>:uruku
<utemŋe>:utemŋe
<ө>:ө
<өbde>:өbde
<өčetelken>:өčetelke{n}
<өdečilen>:өdečile{n}
<өdekčinmej>:өdekčinmej
<өg>:өg
<өgek>:өgek
<өgereben>:өgerebe{n}
<өgerebenmej>:өgerebenmej
<өgereldəwun>:өgereldəwu{n}
<өgeren>:өgere{n}
<өgerenmej>:өgerenmej
<өgeskimče>:өgeskimče
<өgi>:өgi
<өin>:өi{n}
<өinďe>:өinďe
<өir>:өir
<өj>:өj
<өjde>:өjde
<өjden>:өjde{n}
<өjen>:өje{n}
<өjet>:өjet
<өjgiden>:өjgide{n}
<өjgilte>:өjgilte
<өjmuken>:өjmuke{n}
<өkөn>:өkө{n}
<өkčigide>:өkčigide
<өkčin>:өkči{n}
<өkčinmej>:өkčinmej
<өkebe>:өkebe
<өkel>:өkel
<өkelukečin>:өkelukeči{n}
<өkelukečinmej>:өkelukečinmej
<өkeluken>:өkeluke{n}
<өkelukenmej>:өkelukenmej
<өken>:өke{n}
<өken>:өke{n}
<өken>:өke{n}
<өken>:өke{n}
<өken'>:өken'
<өkenďun>:өkenďu{n}
<өkeniruk>:өkeniruk
<өkenre>:өkenre
<өkenre>:өkenre
<өkeŋe>:өkeŋe
<өkermi>:өkermi
<өkes>:өkes
<өkete>:өkete
<өki>:өki
<өkiďek>:өkiďek
<өkimče>:өkimče
<өkimče>:өkimče
<өkin>:өki{n}
<өkre>:өkre
<өkri>:өkri
<өksin>:өksi{n}
<өkte>:өkte
<өlečilenni>:өlečilenni
<өlečimŋe>:өlečimŋe
<өlečin>:өleči{n}
<өlečinmej>:өlečinmej
<өlek>:өlek
<өlekčin>:өlekči{n}
<өlemde>:өlemde
<өlen>:өle{n}
<өlen>:өle{n}
<өlenmej>:өlenmej
<өleŋčen>:өleŋče{n}
<өleŋe>:өleŋe
<өleteďek>:өleteďek
<өlge>:өlge
<өli>:өli
<өliki>:өliki
<өlikis>:өlikis
<өlken>:өlke{n}
<өlkepu>:өlkepu
<өlkepu>:өlkepu
<өlkere>:өlkere
<өlkere>:өlkere
<өlkini>:өlkini
<өllөčimŋe>:өllөčimŋe
<өllөčin>:өllөči{n}
<өlmiďek>:өlmiďek
<өlmikič>:өlmikič
<өlmimkin>:өlmimki{n}
<өlmimŋe>:өlmimŋe
<өlmin>:өlmi{n}
<өlminmej>:өlminmej
<өlneď>:өlneď
<өlsek>:өlsek
<өlučin>:өluči{n}
<өlučinmej>:өlučinmej
<өlumŋe>:өlumŋe
<өlun>:өlu{n}
<өlunmej>:өlunmej
<өlurgen>:өlurge{n}
<өm>:өm
<өm>:өm
<өmčen'e>:өmčen'e
<өmekken>:өmekke{n}
<өmel>:өmel
<өmelduken>:өmelduke{n}
<өmeltuken>:өmeltuke{n}
<өmen>:өme{n}
<өmesne>:өmesne
<өmeteneč>:өmeteneč
<өmiwun>:өmiwu{n}
<өmniričen>:өmniriče{n}
<өmnuldewkečin>:өmnuldewkeči{n}
<өmnuldewkečinmej>:өmnuldewkečinmej
<өmnuldewkenmej>:өmnuldewkenmej
<өmŋetə>:өmŋetə
<өmuldewken>:өmuldewke{n}
<өmusne>:өmusne
<өn>:ө{n}
<өn>:ө{n}
<өn>:ө{n}
<өn'e>:өn'e
<өn'eger>:өn'eger
<өn'eldəwun>:өn'eldəwu{n}
<өn'en>:өn'e{n}
<өn'eruk>:өn'eruk
<өn'etiŋ>:өn'etiŋ
<өnem>:өnem
<өnemeč>:өnemeč
<өnkesek>:өnkesek
<өnki>:өnki
<өnkiden>:өnkide{n}
<өnmeček>:өnmeček
<өnsen>:өnse{n}
<өnten>:өnte{n}
<өnteltečin>:өntelteči{n}
<өnteltečinmej>:өnteltečinmej
<өnteltekečin>:өnteltekeči{n}
<өnteltekečinmej>:өnteltekečinmej
<өntelten>:өntelte{n}
<өnteltenmej>:өnteltenmej
<өntewmečin>:өntewmeči{n}
<өntewmečinmej>:өntewmečinmej
<өŋke>:өŋke
<өŋkečildəwun>:өŋkečildəwu{n}
<өŋkelben>:өŋkelbe{n}
<өŋkelbenmej>:өŋkelbenmej
<өŋkeldəwun>:өŋkeldəwu{n}
<өŋken>:өŋke{n}
<өŋkenmej>:өŋkenmej
<өŋne>:өŋne
<өpkečekeg>:өpkečekeg
<өpkečen>:өpkeče{n}
<өr>:өr
<өregen>:өrege{n}
<өrek>:өrek
<өreldeďek>:өreldeďek
<өrelden>:өrelde{n}
<өreldenmej>:өreldenmej
<өreldewken>:өreldewke{n}
<өren>:өre{n}
<өren>:өre{n}
<өrenmej>:өrenmej
<өrenne>:өrenne
<өreŋčin>:өreŋči{n}
<өreŋčinmej>:өreŋčinmej
<өrewen>:өrewe{n}
<өrin>:өri{n}
<өriki>:өriki
<өrikič>:өrikič
<өrilen>:өrile{n}
<өrilen>:өrile{n}
<өrimkin>:өrimki{n}
<өrinďiďek>:өrinďiďek
<өrine>:өrine
<өriŋčitle>:өriŋčitle
<өrken'>:өrken'
<өrle>:өrle
<өruď>:өruď
<өruďek>:өruďek
<өruken>:өruke{n}
<өrun>:өru{n}
<өrun>:өru{n}
<өrun>:өru{n}
<өrunmej>:өrunmej
<өrunmej>:өrunmej
<өrus>:өrus
<өs>:өs
<өsčen>:өsče{n}
<өsečin>:өseči{n}
<өsečinmej>:өsečinmej
<өsejdemečin>:өsejdemeči{n}
<өsejdemečinmej>:өsejdemečinmej
<өseleldəwun>:өseleldəwu{n}
<өsen>:өse{n}
<өsen>:өse{n}
<өsen>:өse{n}
<өt>:өt
<өtemeček>:өtemeček
<өtemeďek>:өtemeďek
<өtete>:өtete
<өtgen>:өtge{n}
<өtken>:өtke{n}
<өtki>:өtki
<өtus>:өtus
<fabrika>:fabrika
<fajans>:fajans
<fak'el>:fak'el
<fak'elщik>:fak'elщik
<fakt>:fakt
<faktorija>:faktorija
<fakulťet>:fakulťet
<familija>:familija
<fan'era>:fan'era
<fanatik>:fanatik
<fanatizm>:fanatizm
<fantaz'er>:fantaz'er
<fantazija>:fantazija
<fara>:fara
<fašist>:fašist
<filial>:filial
<film>:film
<filosof>:filosof
<filtr>:filtr
<final>:final
<finn>:fin{n}
<firma>:firma
<fitil>:fitil
<fizkultura>:fizkultura
<fizkulturnik>:fizkulturnik
<fjeďeracija>:fjeďeracija
<fjejjerw'erk>:fjejjerw'erk
<fjeldš'er>:fjeldš'er
<fjeljeton>:fjeljeto{n}
<fjerma>:fjerma
<fjewral>:fjewral
<fl'aga>:fl'aga
<flag>:flag
<flagkakan>:flagkaka{n}
<flakon>:flako{n}
<flan'el>:flan'el
<flot>:flot
<folklor>:folklor
<fon'etika>:fon'etika
<fonar'>:fonar'
<fontan>:fonta{n}
<forma>:forma
<fortočka>:fortočka
<fotoalbom>:fotoalbom
<fotoapparat>:fotoapparat
<fotograf>:fotograf
<fotografija>:fotografija
<francuz>:francuz
<frant>:frant
<fraza>:fraza
<front>:front
<frontowik>:frontowik
<frukt>:frukt
<fufajka>:fufajka
<fundam'ent>:fundam'ent
<funkcija>:funkcija
<funt>:funt
<furažka>:furažka
<futbol>:futbol
<futbolist>:futbolist
<futbolka>:futbolka
<futl'ar>:futl'ar
<хajunmaj>:хajunmaj
<хalitgaj>:хalitgaj
<хalkaj>:хalkaj
<хanmaj>:хanmaj
<хaŋanmaj>:хaŋanmaj
<хebďenmej>:хebďenmej
<хepkenmej>:хepkenmej
<хilkanmaj>:хilkanmaj
<хjenmej>:хjenmej
<хujeldemečinmej>:хujeldemečinmej
<хukelunmej>:хukelunmej
<хunanmaj>:хunanmaj
<хunmej>:хunmej
<хupkuwunmej>:хupkuwunmej
<c'ellofan>:c'ellofa{n}
<c'em'ent>:c'em'ent
<c'entn'er>:c'entn'er
<c'entr>:c'entr
<cifjerblat>:cifjerblat
<cifra>:cifra
<cifra>:cifra
<cirk>:cirk
<cirkul>:cirkul
<cəgan>:cəga{n}
<cw'etok>:cw'etok
<щaw'el>:щaw'el
<щi>:щi
<щit>:щit
<щitok>:щitok
<š'etka>:š'etka
<aa>:aa
<afiša>:afiša
<aхmat>:aхmat
<aхwu>:aхwu
<aba>:aba
<abaga>:abaga
<abalaltan>:abalalta{n}
<abalaltanmaj>:abalaltanmaj
<abalawan>:abalawa{n}
<abalčin>:abalči{n}
<abalčinmaj>:abalčinmaj
<abalŋija>:abalŋija
<aban>:aba{n}
<abaŋa>:abaŋa
<abaŋa>:abaŋa
<abaŋanilčakar>:abaŋanilčakar
<abda>:abda
<abdatla>:abdatla
<abdu>:abdu
<abdukan>:abduka{n}
<abdul>:abdul
<abdumija>:abdumija
<abgin>:abgi{n}
<abrikos>:abrikos
<abzac>:abzac
<aččaltaďak>:aččaltaďak
<aččaltamŋa>:aččaltamŋa
<aččaltan>:aččalta{n}
<aččaltanmaj>:aččaltanmaj
<ačičči>:ačičči
<ačiččin'aki>:ačiččin'aki
<ačik>:ačik
<ačilkankan>:ačilkanka{n}
<ačin>:ači{n}
<ačkan>:ačka{n}
<ačurin>:ačuri{n}
<ačurkačan>:ačurkača{n}
<ačurkan>:ačurka{n}
<ačurmilan>:ačurmila{n}
<ačurun>:ačuru{n}
<ada>:ada
<ada>:ada
<adal>:adal
<adalgin>:adalgi{n}
<adalginmaj>:adalginmaj
<adan>:ada{n}
<adan'a>:adan'a
<adarin>:adari{n}
<adarinmaj>:adarinmaj
<adgan>:adga{n}
<aďin>:aďin
<aďit>:aďit
<adəkutəlďi>:adəkutəlďi
<adr'es>:adr'es
<ag>:ag
<agiŋčin>:agiŋčin
<agьiŋčiďak>:agьiŋčiďak
<agьiŋčinmaj>:agьiŋčinmaj
<agalan>:agalan
<agan>:agan
<agdalan>:agdalan
<agdan>:agdan
<agdankan>:agdankan
<agdə>:agdə
<agdə>:agdə
<agdəlkan>:agdəlkan
<agdən>:agdən
<agdərap>:agdərap
<agdəri>:agdəri
<agitacija>:agitacija
<agitator>:agitator
<agitbrigada>:agitbrigada
<agitpunkt>:agitpunkt
<agən>:agən
<agr'essija>:agr'essija
<agronom>:agronom
<ai>:ai
<ailtan>:ailtan
<ailtanmaj>:ailtanmaj
<aimčin>:aimčin
<ain>:ain
<ainmaj>:ainmaj
<aiptiŋ>:aiptiŋ
<air>:air
<air>:air
<airkakan>:airkakan
<airlan>:airlan
<airlanmaj>:airlanmaj
<aist>:aist
<ajanna>:ajanna
<ajanŋa>:ajanŋa
<ajawmačin>:ajawmačin
<ajawmačinmaj>:ajawmačinmaj
<ajawun>:ajawun
<ajčin>:ajčin
<ajčin>:ajčin
<ajčinmaj>:ajčinmaj
<ajčumŋa>:ajčumŋa
<ajčun>:ajčun
<ajčunmaj>:ajčunmaj
<ajďit>:ajďit
<ajkindu>:ajkindu
<ajmataa>:ajmataa
<ajmuldaďak>:ajmuldaďak
<ajmuldan>:ajmuldan
<ajmuldanmaj>:ajmuldanmaj
<ajmuldawkačin>:ajmuldawkačin
<ajmuldawkačinmaj>:ajmuldawkačinmaj
<ajmuldawkan>:ajmuldawkan
<ajmuldawkanmaj>:ajmuldawkanmaj
<ajŋučin>:ajŋučin
<ajŋuraďak>:ajŋuraďak
<ajŋuran>:ajŋuran
<ajŋuranmaj>:ajŋuranmaj
<ajŋurčin>:ajŋurčin
<ajŋurčinmaj>:ajŋurčinmaj
<ajon>:ajon
<ajsačak>:ajsačak
<ajsačin>:ajsačin
<ajsačinmaj>:ajsačinmaj
<ajsb'erg>:ajsb'erg
<ajta>:ajta
<ajuban>:ajuban
<ajubanmaj>:ajubanmaj
<ajučin>:ajučin
<ajučinmaj>:ajučinmaj
<ajuďak>:ajuďak
<ajukačin>:ajukačin
<ajukačinmaj>:ajukačinmaj
<ajukag>:ajukag
<ajumtuk>:ajumtuk
<ajumu>:ajumu
<ajun>:ajun
<aka>:aka
<akalan>:akalan
<akamaldəwun>:akamaldəwun
<akan>:akan
<akan>:akan
<akan>:akan
<akanun>:akanun
<akanur>:akanur
<akaŋa>:akaŋa
<akapan>:akapan
<akar>:akar
<akar>:akar
<akarinni>:akarinni
<akiba>:akiba
<akmamačak>:akmamačak
<akman>:akman
<aktiw>:aktiw
<aktiwist>:aktiwist
<akula>:akula
<al>:al
<al'uminij>:al'uminij
<alfawit>:alfawit
<alačin>:alačin
<alačinmaj>:alačinmaj
<alaďi>:alaďi
<alaldakan>:alaldakan
<alaldakan>:alaldakan
<alaldəwun>:alaldəwun
<alaman>:alaman
<alan>:alan
<alanni>:alanni
<alaŋčin>:alaŋčin
<alaŋčinmaj>:alaŋčinmaj
<alat>:alat
<albom>:albom
<alčaldəwut>:alčaldəwut
<alčildəwun>:alčildəwun
<aldača>:aldača
<aldaldəwun>:aldaldəwun
<aldas>:aldas
<aldatla>:aldatla
<alďi>:alďi
<alďi>:alďi
<alďisag>:alďisag
<aldəwun>:aldəwun
<alďun>:alďun
<alďunmaj>:alďunmaj
<alga>:alga
<algan>:algan
<algas>:algas
<aličin>:aličin
<aličinmaj>:aličinmaj
<alik>:alik
<aliman>:aliman
<alimanmaj>:alimanmaj
<alinra>:alinra
<alitmačak>:alitmačak
<alitmačin>:alitmačin
<alitmačinmaj>:alitmačinmaj
<alka>:alka
<alkadamŋa>:alkadamŋa
<alkag>:alkag
<alkamča>:alkamča
<alma>:alma
<alman>:alman
<almanmaj>:almanmaj
<almaz>:almaz
<alŋa>:alŋa
<alŋagda>:alŋagda
<alŋakačak>:alŋakačak
<alŋakan>:alŋakan
<alra>:alra
<alramča>:alramča
<alta>:alta
<altar>:altar
<altiku>:altiku
<altiŋ>:altiŋ
<aluldəwun>:aluldəwun
<am>:am
<am>:am
<am'erika>:am'erika
<am'erikan'ec>:am'erikan'ec
<am'erikankan>:am'erikankan
<ama>:ama
<amačin>:amačin
<amačinmaj>:amačinmaj
<amagaďak>:amagaďak
<amagaďak>:amagaďak
<amakan>:amakan
<amalkačin>:amalkačin
<amalkačinmaj>:amalkačinmaj
<amalkamačak>:amalkamačak
<amalkan>:amalkan
<amalkanmaj>:amalkanmaj
<aman>:aman
<aman>:aman
<aman>:aman
<amanďa>:amanďa
<amanďa>:amanďa
<amanran>:amanran
<amanranmaj>:amanranmaj
<amaŋa>:amaŋa
<amar>:amar
<amardan>:amardan
<amargilta>:amargilta
<amargiltač>:amargiltač
<amargin>:amargin
<amarkan>:amarkan
<amarkan>:amarkan
<amarkančan>:amarkančan
<amasak>:amasak
<amattə>:amattə
<ambar>:ambar
<ambulatorija>:ambulatorija
<amča>:amča
<amkačakagla>:amkačakagla
<amkačan>:amkačan
<amkag>:amkag
<amkan>:amkan
<amkaruk>:amkaruk
<amŋa>:amŋa
<amŋamak>:amŋamak
<amŋamak>:amŋamak
<amŋan>:amŋan
<amŋisan>:amŋisan
<amrani>:amrani
<amtan>:amtan
<amtil>:amtil
<amtukan>:amtukan
<amtukanmaj>:amtukanmaj
<amu>:amu
<amu>:amu
<amudan>:amudan
<amugan>:amugan
<amukačin>:amukačin
<amukačinmaj>:amukačinmaj
<amukakkan>:amukakkan
<amun>:amun
<an>:an
<an>:an
<an>:an
<an>:an
<an'>:an'
<an'anŋa>:an'anŋa
<an'čap>:an'čap
<an'čin>:an'čin
<anačak>:anačak
<anan>:anan
<anana>:anana
<anda>:anda
<anďil>:anďil
<angličan>:angličan
<angličanin>:angličanin
<anglijankan>:anglijankan
<ani>:ani
<ani>:ani
<anikakan>:anikakan
<animija>:animija
<anin>:anin
<anin>:anin
<anin>:anin
<anin>:anin
<anis>:anis
<anisak>:anisak
<anisan>:anisan
<anit>:anit
<aniwun>:aniwun
<ank'eta>:ank'eta
<anmanra>:anmanra
<anmanra>:anmanra
<anmanra>:anmanra
<anmat>:anmat
<anmatmagan>:anmatmagan
<anŋa>:anŋa
<anŋačiďak>:anŋačiďak
<anŋačin>:anŋačin
<anŋačiŋka>:anŋačiŋka
<anŋak>:anŋak
<anŋaŋ>:anŋaŋ
<anŋu>:anŋu
<antag>:antag
<antə>:antə
<anun>:anun
<anun>:anun
<aŋaďak>:aŋaďak
<aŋaďak>:aŋaďak
<aŋan>:aŋan
<aŋan>:aŋan
<aŋanaďak>:aŋanaďak
<aŋanalan>:aŋanalan
<aŋanalanni>:aŋanalanni
<aŋanamŋa>:aŋanamŋa
<aŋanan>:aŋanan
<aŋananmaj>:aŋananmaj
<aŋanmaj>:aŋanmaj
<aŋantiŋ>:aŋantiŋ
<aŋar>:aŋar
<aŋar>:aŋar
<aŋatkan>:aŋatkan
<aŋčin>:aŋčin
<aŋčinmaj>:aŋčinmaj
<aŋra>:aŋra
<aŋračan>:aŋračan
<aŋranďa>:aŋranďa
<aŋta>:aŋta
<aŋtaramkačin>:aŋtaramkačin
<aŋtaramkačinmaj>:aŋtaramkačinmaj
<aŋtaramkan>:aŋtaramkan
<aŋtaramkanmaj>:aŋtaramkanmaj
<aŋun>:aŋun
<ap'elsin>:ap'elsin
<apagi>:apagi
<apkan>:apkan
<apkit>:apkit
<apogi>:apogi
<apparat>:apparat
<apr'el>:apr'el
<apťeka>:apťeka
<aptu>:aptu
<aptun>:aptun
<ara>:ara
<arabgan>:arabgan
<aračak>:aračak
<aračimŋa>:aračimŋa
<araďiola>:araďiola
<araďis>:araďis
<araďiwa>:araďiwa
<araďiwa>:araďiwa
<araďiwamagain>:araďiwamagain
<araďiwaprijemnik>:araďiwaprijemnik
<araďiwastancija>:araďiwastancija
<aragan>:aragan
<arajkom>:arajkom
<arajon>:arajon
<arak>:arak
<arak>:arak
<arakačak>:arakačak
<arakan>:arakan
<arakťer>:arakťer
<arakťeristika>:arakťeristika
<arama>:arama
<aramka>:aramka
<aramra>:aramra
<aramra>:aramra
<aramta>:aramta
<aran>:aran
<arbati>:arbati
<arbun>:arbun
<arbun>:arbun
<arbuz>:arbuz
